Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1309
Collection system; additional remedy.

The collection remedy authorized by the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act is in addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy available by law.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 41.